Tennessee, session 114, HB0284.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-246, is amended by deleting
subdivision (61).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-250, is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Traumatic brain injury advisory council, created by § 68-55-102;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0284
000365
- 1 -